North Carolina statutes. Chapter 45. Mortgages and Deeds of Trust.
PART 2.
PROCEDURE FOR SALE.

§ 45-21.16. Notice and hearing.

The mortgagee or trustee granted a power of sale under a mortgage or deed of trust who seeks to exercise such power of sale shall file with the clerk of court a notice of hearing in accordance with the terms of this section. After the notice of hearing is filed, the notice of hearing shall be served upon each party entitled to notice under this section. The notice shall specify a time and place for the hearing before the clerk of court and shall be served not less than 10 days prior to the date of such hearing. The notice shall be served and proof of service shall be made in any manner provided by the Rules of Civil Procedure for service of summons, including service by registered mail or certified mail, return receipt requested. However, in those instances that publication would be authorized, service may be made by posting a notice in a conspicuous place and manner upon the property not less than 20 days prior to the date of the hearing, and if service upon a party cannot be effected after a reasonable and diligent effort in a manner authorized above, notice to such party may be given by posting the notice in a conspicuous place and manner upon the property not less than 20 days prior to the date of hearing. Service by posting may run concurrently with any other effort to effect service. The notice shall be posted by the sheriff. In the event that the service is obtained by posting, an affidavit shall be filed with the clerk of court showing the circumstances warranting the use of service by posting.

If any party is not served or is not timely served prior to the date of the hearing, the clerk shall order the hearing continued to a date and time certain, not less than 10 days from the date scheduled for the original hearing. All notices already timely served remain effective. The mortgagee or trustee shall satisfy the notice requirement of this section with respect to those parties not served or not timely served with respect to the original hearing. Any party timely served, who has not received actual notice of the date to which the hearing has been continued, shall be sent the order of continuance by first-class mail at his last known address.

Notice of hearing shall be served in a manner authorized in subsection (a) upon:

Any person to whom the security interest instrument itself directs notice to be sent in case of default.

Any person obligated to repay the indebtedness against whom the holder thereof intends to assert liability therefor, and any such person not notified shall not be liable for any deficiency remaining after the sale.

Every record owner of the real estate whose interest is of record in the county where the real property is located at the time the notice of hearing is filed in that county. The term "record owner" means any person owning a present or future interest in the real property, which interest is of record at the time that the notice of hearing is filed and would be affected by the foreclosure proceeding, but does not mean or include the trustee in a deed of trust or the owner or holder of a mortgage, deed of trust, judgment, mechanic's or materialman's lien, or other lien or security interest in the real property. Tenants in possession under unrecorded leases or rental agreements shall not be considered record owners.

Notice shall be in writing and shall state in a manner reasonably calculated to make the party entitled to notice aware of the following:

The particular real estate security interest being foreclosed, with such a description as is necessary to identify the real property, including the date, original amount, original holder, and book and page of the security instrument.

The name and address of the holder of the security instrument at the time that the notice of hearing is filed.

The nature of the default claimed.

The fact, if such be the case, that the secured creditor has accelerated the maturity of the debt.

Any right of the debtor to pay the indebtedness or cure the default if such is permitted.

(5a) The holder has confirmed in writing to the person giving the notice, or if the holder is giving the notice, the holder shall confirm in the notice, that, within 30 days of the date of the notice, the debtor was sent by first-class mail at the debtor's last known address a detailed written statement of the amount of principal, interest, and any other fees, expenses, and disbursements that the holder in good faith is claiming to be due as of the date of the written statement, together with a daily interest charge based on the contract rate as of the date of the written statement. Nothing herein is intended to authorize any fees, charges, or methods of charging interest which is not otherwise permitted under contract between the parties and other applicable law.

(5b) To the knowledge of the holder, or the servicer acting on the holder's behalf, whether in the two years preceding the date of the statement any requests for information have been made by the borrower to the servicer pursuant to

G.S. 45-93

and, if so, whether such requests have been complied with. If the time limits set forth in

G.S. 45-93

for complying with any such requests for information have not yet expired as of the date of the notice, the notice shall so state. If the holder is not giving the notice, the holder shall confirm in writing to the person giving the notice the information required by this subsection to be stated in the notice.

Repealed by Session Laws 1977, c. 359, s. 7.

The right of the debtor (or other party served) to appear before the clerk of court at a time and on a date specified, at which appearance he shall be afforded the opportunity to show cause as to why the foreclosure should not be allowed to be held. The notice shall contain all of the following:

A statement that if the debtor does not intend to contest the creditor's allegations of default, the debtor does not have to appear at the hearing and that the debtor's failure to attend the hearing will not affect the debtor's right to pay the indebtedness and thereby prevent the proposed sale, or to attend the actual sale, should the debtor elect to do so.

A statement that the trustee, or substitute trustee, is a neutral party and, while holding that position in the foreclosure proceeding, may not advocate for the secured creditor or for the debtor in the foreclosure proceeding.

A statement that the debtor has the right to apply to a judge of the superior court pursuant to

G.S. 45-21.34

to enjoin the sale, upon any legal or equitable ground that the court may deem sufficient prior to the time that the rights of the parties to the sale or resale become fixed, provided that the debtor complies with the requirements of

G.S. 45-21.34

.

A statement that the debtor has the right to appear at the hearing and contest the evidence that the clerk is to consider under

G.S. 45-21.16

(d), and that to authorize the foreclosure the clerk must find the existence of: (i) valid debt of which the party seeking to foreclose is the holder, (ii) default, (iii) right to foreclose under the instrument, and (iv) notice to those entitled to notice.

A statement that if the debtor fails to appear at the hearing, the trustee will ask the clerk for an order to sell the real property being foreclosed.

A statement that the debtor has the right to seek the advice of an attorney and that free legal services may be available to the debtor by contacting Legal Aid of North Carolina or other legal services organizations.

That if the foreclosure sale is consummated, the purchaser will be entitled to possession of the real estate as of the date of delivery of his deed, and that the debtor, if still in possession, can then be evicted.

(8a) The name, address, and telephone number of the trustee or mortgagee.

That the debtor should keep the trustee or mortgagee notified in writing of his address so that he can be mailed copies of the notice of foreclosure setting forth the terms under which the sale will be held, and notice of any postponements or resales.

If the notice of hearing is intended to serve also as a notice of sale, such additional information as is set forth in

G.S. 45-21.16

A.

That the hearing may be held on a date later than that stated in the notice and that the party will be notified of any change in the hearing date.

That if the debtor is currently on military duty the foreclosure may be prohibited by

G.S. 45-21.12

A.

(c1)
The person giving the notice of hearing, if other than the holder, may rely on the written confirmation received from the holder under subdivisions (c)(5a) and (c)(5b) of this section and is not liable for inaccuracies in the written confirmation.

(c2)
In any foreclosure filed on or after November 1, 2010, where the underlying mortgage debt is a home loan as defined in

G.S. 45-101(1b)

, the notice required by subsection (b) of this section shall contain a certification by the filing party that the pre-foreclosure notice and information required by

G.S. 45-102

and

G.S. 45-103

were provided in all material respects and that the periods of time established by Article 11 of this Chapter have elapsed.

The hearing provided by this section shall be held before the clerk of court in the county where the land, or any portion thereof, is situated. In the event that the property to be sold consists of separate tracts situated in different counties or a single tract in more than one county, only one hearing shall be necessary. However, prior to that hearing, the mortgagee or trustee shall file the notice of hearing in any other county where any portion of the property to be sold is located. Upon such hearing, the clerk shall consider the evidence of the parties and may consider, in addition to other forms of evidence required or permitted by law, affidavits and certified copies of documents. If the clerk finds the existence of (i) valid debt of which the party seeking to foreclose is the holder, (ii) default, (iii) right to foreclose under the instrument, (iv) notice to those entitled to such under subsection (b), (v) that the underlying mortgage debt is not a home loan as defined in

G.S. 45-101(1b)

, or if the loan is a home loan under

G.S. 45-101(1b)

, that the pre-foreclosure notice under

G.S. 45-102

was provided in all material respects, and that the periods of time established by Article 11 of this Chapter have elapsed, and (vi) that the sale is not barred by

G.S. 45-21.12

A, then the clerk shall authorize the mortgagee or trustee to proceed under the instrument, and the mortgagee or trustee can give notice of and conduct a sale pursuant to the provisions of this Article. A certified copy of any authorization or order by the clerk shall be filed in any other county where any portion of the property to be sold is located before the mortgagee or trustee may proceed to advertise and sell any property located in that county. In the event that sales are to be held in more than one county, the provisions of

G.S. 45-21.7

apply.

(d1)
The act of the clerk in so finding or refusing to so find is a judicial act and may be appealed to the judge of the district or superior court having jurisdiction at any time within 10 days after said act. Appeals from said act of the clerk shall be heard de novo. If an appeal is taken from the clerk's findings, the appealing party shall post a bond with sufficient surety as the clerk deems adequate to protect the opposing party from any probable loss by reason of appeal; and upon posting of the bond the clerk shall stay the foreclosure pending appeal. If the appealing party owns and occupies the property to be sold as his or her principal residence, the clerk shall require a bond in the amount of one percent (1%) of the principal balance due on the note or debt instrument, provided that the clerk, in the clerk's discretion, may require a lesser amount in cases of undue hardship or for other good cause shown; and further provided that the clerk, in the clerk's discretion, may require a higher bond if there is a likelihood of waste or damage to the property during the pendency of the appeal or for other good cause shown.

In the event of an appeal, either party may demand that the matter be heard at the next succeeding term of the court to which the appeal is taken which convenes 10 or more days after the hearing before the clerk, and such hearing shall take precedence over the trial of other cases except cases of exceptions to homesteads and appeals in summary ejectment actions, provided the presiding judge may in his discretion postpone such hearing if the rights of the parties or the public in any other pending case require that such case be heard first. In those counties where no session of court is scheduled within 30 days from the date of hearing before the clerk, either party may petition any regular or special superior court judge resident in a district or assigned to hold courts in a district where any part of the real estate is located, or the chief district judge of a district where any part of the real estate is located, who shall be authorized to hear the appeal. A certified copy of any order entered as a result of the appeal shall be filed in all counties where the notice of hearing has been filed.

Waiver of the right to notice and hearing provided herein shall not be permitted except as set forth herein. In any case in which the original principal amount of indebtedness secured was one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), or more, any person entitled to notice and hearing may waive after default the right to notice and hearing by written instrument signed and duly acknowledged by such party. In all other cases, at any time subsequent to service of the notice of hearing provided above, the clerk, upon the request of the mortgagee or trustee, shall mail to all other parties entitled to notice of such hearing a form by which such parties may waive their rights to the hearing. Upon the return of the forms to the clerk bearing the signatures of each such party and that of a witness to each such party's signature (which witness shall not be an agent or employee of the mortgagee or trustee), the clerk in his discretion may dispense with the necessity of a hearing and proceed to issue the order authorizing sale as set forth above.

Any notice, order, or other papers required by this Article to be filed in the office of the clerk of superior court shall be filed in the same manner as a special proceeding.

(1975, c. 492, s. 2; 1977, c. 359, ss. 2-10; 1983, c. 335, s. 1; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1108, ss. 1, 2; 1993, c. 305, s. 8; 1995, c. 509, s. 135.1(g); 1999-137, ss. 1, 2; 2007-351, s. 4; 2008-226, ss. 2, 3; 2009-573, s. 2; 2010-168, ss. 2, 3, 9; 2010-190, ss. 2, 3; 2012-79, s. 2.17(g).)

Editor's Note.

- The Rules of Civil Procedure, referred to in subsection (a), are codified at

G.S. 1A-1

.

Session Laws 2009-573, s. 1, provides: "This act shall be known and may be cited as the 'Consumer Economic Protection Act of 2009.' "

Session Laws 2008-226, s. 6, as amended by Session Laws 2010-168, s. 9, and Session Laws 2012-79, s. 2.17(g), made amendments to this section by Session Laws 2008-226, ss. 2 and 3, effective November 1, 2008. Session Laws 2012-79, s. 2.17(g), deleted the sunset provision and thus subsection (c2) and the amendment to subsection (d) of this section will not expire May 31, 2013.

Effect of Amendments.

- Session Laws 2007-351, s. 4, effective April 1, 2008, rewrote subdivision (c)(5a); added subdivision (c)(5b); in subdivision (c)(7), rewrote the last sentence and added (c)(7)a. through f.; in subsection (c1), substituted "subdivisions (c)(5a) and (c)(5b)" for "subdivision (c)(5a)" in the first sentence and deleted the former last sentence which read: "Any dispute concerning the mailing or accuracy of the written statement described in subdivision (c)(5a) of this section shall not be considered in a hearing under this section."

Session Laws 2008-226, ss. 2 and 3, as amended by Session Laws 2010-168, s. 9, effective November 1, 2008, and expiring May 31, 2013, added subsection (c2); and in the fifth sentence of subsection (d), inserted clause (v), and made related stylistic changes. Session Laws 2012-79, s. 2.17(g) deleted the May 31, 2013 expiration date.

Session Laws 2010-168, ss. 2 and 3, effective November 1, 2010, in subsection (c2), substituted "November 1, 2010" for "November 15, 2008" and "home loan as defined in

G.S. 45-101(1b)

" for "subprime loan as defined in

G.S. 45-101(4)

"; and in the fifth sentence in subsection (d), twice substituted "home loan" for "subprime loan" and "G.S. 45-101(1b)" for "G.S. 45-101(4)."

Session Laws 2010-190, s. 3, effective January 1, 2011, and applicable to foreclosures initiated on or after that date, in the fifth sentence in the first version of subsection (d), added "and (vi) that the sale is not barred by

G.S. 45-21.12

A" and made a related grammatical change; and in the fifth sentence in the second version of subsection (d), added "and (v) that the sale is not barred by

G.S. 45-21.12

A."

Legal Periodicals.

- For comment discussing changes in North Carolina's foreclosure law, see 54 N.C.L. Rev. 903 (1976).

For survey of 1978 property law, see 57 N.C.L. Rev. 1103 (1979).

For survey of 1980 property law, see 59 N.C.L. Rev. 1209 (1981).

For comment, "'A Topsy-Turvy World': High Point Bank & Trust Co. v. Highmark Properties, LLC and the Modern Application of the Fair Market Value Offset Defense," see
95 N.C.L. Rev. 857 (2017).

For comment, "Out of Luck: The Effect of the North Carolina Supreme Court's Decision in In re Lucks and its Impact on the Law of Foreclosures," see 41 Campbell L. Rev. 253 (2019).

§ 45-21.16A. Contents of notice of sale.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the notice of sale shall include all of the following:

Describe the instrument pursuant to which the sale is held, by identifying the original mortgagors and recording data. If the record owner is different from the original mortgagors, the notice shall also list the record owner of the property, as reflected on the records of the register of deeds not more than 10 days prior to posting the notice. The notice may also reflect the owner not reflected on the records if known.

Designate the date, hour and place of sale consistent with the provisions of the instrument and this Article.

Describe the real property to be sold in a manner that is reasonably calculated to inform the public as to what is being sold. The description may be in general terms and may incorporate by reference the description used in the instrument containing the power of sale. Any property described in the instrument containing the power of sale which is not being offered for sale should also be described in a manner to enable prospective purchasers to determine what is and what is not being offered for sale.

Repealed by Session Laws 1967, c. 562, s. 2.

State the terms of the sale provided for by the instrument pursuant to which the sale is held, including the amount of the cash deposit, if any, to be made by the highest bidder at the sale.

Include any other provisions required by the instrument to be included.

State that the property will be sold subject to taxes and special assessments if it is to be so sold.

State whether the property is being sold subject to or together with any subordinate rights or interests provided those rights and interests are sufficiently identified.

In addition to the requirements contained in subsection (a) of this section, the notice of sale of residential real property with less than 15 rental units shall also state all of the following:

That an order for possession of the property may be issued pursuant to

G.S. 45-21.29

in favor of the purchaser and against the party or parties in possession by the clerk of superior court of the county in which the property is sold.

Any person who occupies the property pursuant to a rental agreement entered into or renewed on or after October 1, 2007, may, after receiving the notice of sale, terminate the rental agreement by providing written notice of termination to the landlord, to be effective on a date stated in the notice that is at least 10 days, but no more than 90 days, after the sale date contained in the notice of sale, provided that the mortgagor has not cured the default at the time the tenant provides the notice of termination. The notice shall also state that upon termination of a rental agreement, the tenant is liable for rent due under the rental agreement prorated to the effective date of the termination.

(1949, c. 720, s. 1; 1951, c. 252, s. 1; 1967, c. 562, s. 2; 1975, c. 492, s. 1; 1987, c. 493; 1993, c. 305, s. 9; 2007-353, s. 1; 2015-178, s. 1(c).)

Cross References.

- As to contents of notice of judicial sales, see

G.S. 1-339.15

.

As to contents of notice of executive sales, see

G.S. 1-339.51

.

As to validation of certain foreclosure sales when provisions of subdivision (3) of this section are not complied with, see

G.S. 45-21.49

.

Editor's Note.

- Session Laws 1975, c. 492, which enacted this section, provides in s. 14: "The words clerk of court as used in this act shall be deemed to include assistant clerk of court."

Session Laws 2015-178, s. 6, provides, in part, that the rewriting of subdivision (b)(2) by Session Laws 2015-178, s. 1(c), is applicable to a notice of sale issued on or after October 1, 2015.

Effect of Amendments.

- Session Laws 2007-353, s. 1, effective October 1, 2007, and applicable to notices of sale issued on or after that date, rewrote subsection (a); in subdivision (a)(3), inserted "by reference" preceding "the description" and substituted "sale" for "sale by reference thereto" in the second sentence; added subsection (b);
and made minor stylistic changes throughout.

Session Laws 2015-178, s. 1(c), effective October 1, 2015, rewrote subdivision (b)(2). For applicability, see editor's note.

Legal Periodicals.

- For comment discussing changes in North Carolina's foreclosure law, see 54 N.C.L. Rev. 903 (1976).

§ 45-21.16B: Repealed by Session Laws 2013-412, s. 7, effective August 23, 2013.

(2008-228, s. 18; repealed by 2013-412, s. 7, effective August 23, 2013.)

Editor's Note.

- Former

G.S. 45-21.16

B pertained to suspension of foreclosure proceedings.

§ 45-21.16C. Opportunity for parties to resolve foreclosure of owner-occupied residential property.

At the commencement of the hearing, the clerk shall inquire as to whether the debtor occupies the real property at issue as his or her principal residence. If it appears that the debtor does currently occupy the property as a principal residence, the clerk shall further inquire as to the efforts the mortgagee, trustee, or loan servicer has made to communicate with the debtor and to attempt to resolve the matter voluntarily before the foreclosure proceeding. The clerk's inquiry shall not be required if the mortgagee or trustee has submitted, at or before the hearing, an affidavit briefly describing any efforts that have been made to resolve the default with the debtor and the results of any such efforts.

The clerk shall order the hearing continued if the clerk finds that there is good cause to believe that additional time or additional measures have a reasonable likelihood of resolving the delinquency without foreclosure. In determining whether to continue the hearing, the clerk may consider (i) whether the mortgagee, trustee, or loan servicer has offered the debtor an opportunity to resolve the foreclosure through forbearance, loan modification, or other commonly accepted resolution plan appropriate under the circumstances, (ii) whether the mortgagee, trustee, or loan servicer has engaged in actual responsive communication with the debtor, including telephone conferences or in-person meetings with the debtor or other actual two-party communications, (iii) whether the debtor has indicated that he or she has the intent and ability to resolve the delinquency by making future payments under a foreclosure resolution plan, and (iv) whether the initiation or continuance of good faith voluntary resolution efforts between the parties may resolve the matter without a foreclosure sale. Where good cause exists to continue the hearing, the clerk shall order the hearing continued to a date and time certain not more than 60 days from the date scheduled for the original hearing. Nothing in this part shall limit the authority of the clerk to continue a hearing for other good cause shown.

(2009-573, s. 3.)

Editor's Note.

- Session Laws 2009-573, s. 1, provides: "This act shall be known and may be cited as the 'Consumer Economic Protection Act of 2009.' "

Session Laws 2009-573, s. 11, made this section effective October 1, 2009, and applicable to foreclosures initiated, debt collection activities undertaken, and actions filed on or after that date.

§ 45-21.17. Posting and publishing notice of sale of real property.

In addition to complying with such provisions with respect to posting or publishing notice of sale as are contained in the security instrument,

Notice of sale of real property shall

Be posted, in the area designated by the clerk of superior court for posting public notices in the county in which the property is situated, at least 20 days immediately preceding the sale.

And in addition thereto,

The notice shall be published once a week for at least two successive weeks in a newspaper published and qualified for legal advertising in the county in which the property is situated.

If no such newspaper is published in the county, then notice shall be published once a week for at least two successive weeks in a newspaper having a general circulation in the county.

In addition to the required newspaper advertisement, the clerk may in his discretion, on application of any interested party, authorize such additional advertisement as in the opinion of the clerk will serve the interest of the parties, and permit the charges for such further advertisement to be taxed as a part of the costs of the foreclosure.

When the notice of sale is published in a newspaper,

The period from the date of the first publication to the date of the last publication, both dates inclusive, shall not be less than seven days, including Sundays, and

The date of the last publication shall be not more than 10 days preceding the date of the sale.

When the real property to be sold is situated in more than one county, the provisions of subdivisions (1) and (2) shall be complied with in each county in which any part of the property is situated.

The notice of sale shall be mailed by first-class mail at least 20 days prior to the date of sale to each party entitled to notice of the hearing provided by

G.S. 45-21.16

whose address is known to the trustee or mortgagee and in addition shall also be mailed by first-class mail to any party desiring a copy of the notice of sale who has complied with

G.S. 45-21.17

A. If the property is residential and contains less than 15 rental units, including single-family residential real property, the notice of sale shall also be mailed to any person who occupies the property pursuant to a residential rental agreement by name, if known, at the address of the property to be sold. If the name of the person who occupies the property is not known, the notice shall be sent to "occupant" at the address of the property to be sold. Notice of the hearing required by

G.S. 45-21.16

shall be sufficient to satisfy the requirement of notice under this section provided such notice contains the information required by G.S. 45-21.16A.

Repealed by Session Laws 1993, c. 305, s. 10.

Any time periods relating to notice of hearing or notice of sale that are provided in the security instrument may commence with and run concurrently with the time periods provided in

G.S. 45-21.16

, 45-21.17, or 45-21.17A.

(1949, c. 720, s. 1; 1965, c. 41; 1967, c. 979, s. 3; 1975, c. 492, s. 3; 1977, c. 359, ss. 11-14; 1985, c. 567, s. 1; 1993, c. 305, s. 10; 2007-353, s. 2; 2015-178, s. 1(a).)

Editor's Note.

- Session Laws 1975, c. 492, which rewrote this section, provides in s. 14: "The words clerk of court as used in this act shall be deemed to include assistant clerk of court."

Session Laws 2015-178, s. 6, provides, in part, that the amendment by Session Laws 2015-178, s. 1(a) to subdivision (4) applies to notice of sale issued on or after October 1, 2015.

Effect of Amendments.

- Session Laws 2007-353, s. 2, effective October 1, 2007, and applicable to notices of sale issued on or after that date, added the second and third sentences in subdivision (4).

Session Laws 2015-178, s. 1(a), effective October 1, 2015, inserted "including single-family residential real property" in the second sentence of subdivision (4). For applicability, see editor's note.

Legal Periodicals.

- For survey of 1972 case law on notice requirements of the nonjudicial foreclosure sale, see 51 N.C.L. Rev. 1110 (1973).

For comment discussing changes in North Carolina's foreclosure law, see 54 N.C.L. Rev. 903 (1976).

For article discussing installment land contracts in North Carolina, see 3 Campbell L. Rev. 29 (1981).

For comment, "Out of Luck: The Effect of the North Carolina Supreme Court's Decision in In re Lucks and its Impact on the Law of Foreclosures," see 41 Campbell L. Rev. 253 (2019).

§ 45-21.17A. Requests for copies of notice.

Any person desiring a copy of any notice of sale may, at any time subsequent to the recordation of the security instrument and prior to the filing of notice of hearing provided for in

G.S. 45-21.16

, cause to be filed for record in the office of the register of deeds of each county where all or any part of the real property is situated, a duly acknowledged request for a copy of such notice of sale. This request shall be a separate instrument entitled "Request for Notice" and shall be signed and acknowledged by the party making the request, shall specify the name and address of the party to whom the notice is to be mailed, shall identify the deed of trust or mortgage by stating the names of the parties thereto, the date of recordation, and the book and page where the same is recorded, and shall be in substantially the following form:

Register of Deeds' Duties. - Upon the filing for record of such request, the register of deeds shall index in the general index of grantors the names of the trustors (mortgagors) recited therein, and the names of the persons requesting copies, with a reference in the index of the book and page of the recorded security instrument to which the request refers.

Mailing Notice. - The mortgagee, trustee, or other person authorized to conduct the sale shall at least 20 days prior to the date of the sale cause to be deposited in the United States mail an envelope with postage prepaid containing a copy of the notice of sale, addressed to each person whose name and address are set forth in the Request for Notice, and directed to the address designated in such request.

Effect of Request on Title. - No request for a copy of any notice filed pursuant to this section nor any statement or allegation in any such request nor any record thereof shall affect the title to real property, or be deemed notice to any person that the person requesting copies of notice has any claim or any right, title or interest in, or lien or charge upon, the property described in the deed of trust or mortgage referred to therein.

Evidence of Compliance. - The affidavit of the mortgagee, trustee, or other person authorized to conduct the sale that copies of the notice of sale have been mailed to all parties filing requests for the same hereunder shall be deemed prima facie true. If on hearing it is proven that a party seeking to have the foreclosure sale set aside or seeking damages resulting from the foreclosure sale was mailed notice in accordance with this section or had actual notice of the sale before it was held (or if a resale was involved, prior to the date of the last resale), then the party shall not prevail. Costs, expenses, and reasonable attorneys' fees incurred by the prevailing party in any action to set aside the foreclosure sale or for damages resulting from the foreclosure sale shall be allowed as of course to the prevailing party.

Action to Set Foreclosure Sale Aside for Failure to Comply. - A person entitled to notice of sale by virtue of this section shall not bring any action to set the sale aside on grounds that he was not mailed the notice of sale unless such action is brought prior to the filing of the final report and account as provided in

G.S. 45-21.33

, if the property was purchased by someone other than the secured party; or if brought by the secured party, unless such action is brought within six months of the date of such filing and prior to the time the secured party sells the property to a bona fide purchaser for value, if the property was purchased by the secured party. In either event, the party bringing such an action shall also tender an amount exceeding the reported sale price or the amount of the secured party's interest in the property, including all expenses and accrued interest, whichever is greater. Such tender shall be irrevocable pending final adjudication of the action.

Action for Damages from Foreclosure Sale for Failure to Comply. - A person entitled to notice of sale by virtue of this section shall not bring any action for damages resulting from the sale on grounds that he was not mailed the notice unless such action is brought within six months of the date of the filing of the final report and account as provided in

G.S. 45-21.33

. The party bringing such an action shall also deposit with the clerk a cash or surety bond approved by the clerk and in such amount as the clerk deems adequate to secure the party defending the action for such costs, expenses, and reasonable attorneys' fees to be incurred in the action.

"REQUEST FOR NOTICE"

In accordance with the provisions of

G.S. 45-21.17

A, request is hereby made that a copy of any notice of sale under the deed of trust (mortgage) recorded on ________, ________, in Book ________, page ________, records of ________ County, North Carolina, executed by ______________ as trustor (mortgagor), in which ______________ is named as beneficiary (mortgagee), and ______________ as trustee, be mailed to ______________ at the following
address: ___________________________________________________________________.
Signature: _________________________________________________________________

[Acknowledgement]

(1993, c. 305, s. 11; 1999-456, s. 59; 2011-246, s. 2; 2012-18, s. 1.3.)

Effect of Amendments.

- Session Laws 2011-246, s. 2, effective October 1, 2011, substituted "with a reference in the index" for "with a marginal entry in the index" near the middle of subsection (b).

Session Laws 2012-18, s. 1.3, effective July 1, 2012, deleted "or upon the filing for record of such request, the register of deeds may, instead of indexing such request on the general index of grantors, stamp upon the face of the security instrument referred to in the request the book and page of each request for notice thereunder" from the end of subsection (b).

§§ 45-21.18, 45-21.19: Repealed by Session Laws 1967, c. 562, s. 2.

A power of sale is terminated if, prior to the time fixed for a sale, or prior to the expiration of the time for submitting any upset bid after a sale or resale has been held, payment is made or tendered

of -

The obligation secured by the mortgage or deed of trust, and

The expenses incurred with respect to the sale or proposed sale, which in the case of a deed of trust also include compensation for the trustee's services under the conditions set forth in

G.S. 45-21.15

.

(1949, c. 720, s. 1; 1967, c. 562, s. 2.)